Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2019.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The board of county commissioners shall appoint a
qualified person to assume a county-elected office that has become vacant
because of not having a candidate stand for election at the most recent
general election.
(b) As used in this section, "county-elected office" means a position
occupied by a member of the board of county commissioners, the county
attorney, sheriff, clerk, treasurer or register of deeds.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.